Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.190

Court may stay proceedings and restrain parties.

The court, in its discretion and upon such conditions and with or without such bond or other security as it deems necessary and proper, may stay any ruling, order, or any court proceedings prior to final judgment or decree and may restrain all parties involved in order to secure the benefits and preserve and protect the rights of all parties to the court proceedings.

[ 1965 c 131 s 1.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 57.